Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.300.471

Medical emergency response and automated external defibrillator program.

(1) An automated external defibrillator is often a critical component in the chain of survival for a cardiac arrest victim.

(2) The office of the superintendent of public instruction, in consultation with school districts and stakeholder groups, shall develop guidance for a medical emergency response and automated external defibrillator program for high schools.

(3) The medical emergency response and automated external defibrillator program must comply with current evidence-based guidance from the American heart association or other national science organization.

(4) The office of the superintendent of public instruction, in consultation with the department of health, shall assist districts in carrying out a program under this section, including providing guidelines and advice for seeking grants for the purchase of automated external defibrillators or seeking donations of automated external defibrillators. The superintendent may coordinate with local health districts or other organizations in seeking grants and donations for this purpose.

[ 2013 c 181 s 2.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—2013 c 181: See note following RCW 28A.230.179.